zh-TW: 遊玩表面材質: 波羅的海樺木; 山毛櫸木; 樺木; MDF/HDF (工程木材); 桃花心木; 楓木; 橡木; 奧古曼木; 合板 (未指定); 白楊木; 雲杉木; 胡桃木; 其他
da: Materiale i spilleflade: Baltisk birk; Bøg; Birk; MDF/HDF (konstruktionstræ); Mahogni; Ahorn; Eg; Okoumé; Krydsfiner (uspecificeret); Poppel; Gran; Valnød; Andet
pt-PT: Material da superfície de percussão: Bétula do Báltico; Faia; Bétula; MDF/HDF (madeira reconstituída); Mogno; Bordo; Carvalho; Okoumé; Contraplacado (não especificado); Choupo; Abeto; Nogueira; Outro
fr: Matériau de la surface de jeu: Bouleau de la Baltique; Hêtre; Bouleau; MDF/HDF (bois d’ingénierie); Acajou; Érable; Chêne; Okoumé; Contreplaqué (non spécifié); Peuplier; Épicéa; Noyer; Autre
en: Playing surface material: Baltic birch; Beech; Birch; MDF/HDF (engineered wood); Mahogany; Maple; Oak; Okoume; Plywood (unspecified); Poplar; Spruce; Walnut; Other
ja: プレイ表面素材: バルティックバーチ; ビーチ; バーチ; MDF/HDF (エンジニアードウッド); マホガニー; メープル; オーク; オクメ; 合板 (指定なし); ポプラ; スプルース; ウォルナット; その他
cs: Materiál hrací plochy: Baltská bříza; Buk; Bříza; MDF/HDF (umělé dřevo); Mahagon; Javor; Dub; Okoumé; Překližka (nespecifikovaná); Topol; Smrk; Ořech; Jiné
lt-LT: Žaidimo paviršiaus medžiaga: Baltijos beržas; Bukas; Beržas; MDF / HDF (inžinerinė mediena); Raudonmedis; Klevas; Ąžuolas; Okumė; Fanera (nenurodyta); Tuopa; Eglė; Riešutmedis; Kita
tr: Oyun yüzeyi malzemesi: Baltık huş ağacı; Kayın ağacı; Huş ağacı; MDF/HDF (işlenmiş ahşap); Maun ağacı; Akçaağaç; Meşe ağacı; Okoume; Kontrplak (belirtilmemiş); Kavak ağacı; Ladin ağacı; Ceviz ağacı; Diğer
nl: Materiaal speeloppervlak: Baltisch berkenhout; Beukenhout; Berkenhout; MDF/HDF (bewerkt hout); Mahoniehout; Esdoornhout; Eikenhout; Okoume; Multiplex (ongespecificeerd); Populier; Vurenhout; Walnoothout; Overig
fi: Soittopinnan materiaali: Baltian koivu; Pyökki; Koivu; MDF/HDF (tekninen puu); Mahonki; Vaahtera; Tammi; Okume; Vaneri (määrittelemätön); Poppeli; Kuusi; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำพื้นผิวสำหรับเล่น: ไม้เบิร์ชบอลติก; ไม้บีช; ไม้เบิร์ช; MDF/HDF (ไม้เอ็นจิเนียร์); ไม้มะฮอกกานี; ไม้เมเปิล; ไม้โอ๊ค; ไม้โอคูเม; ไม้อัด (ไม่ระบุ); ไม้พ็อปลาร์; ไม้สปรูซ; ไม้วอลนัท; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Materijal igraće površine: Baltička breza; Bukva; Breza; MDF/HDF (konstrukcijsko drvo); Mahagonij; Javor; Hrast; Okoume; Šperploča (nenaznačeno); Topola; Smreka; Orah; Ostalo
de: Spielflächenmaterial: Baltische Birke; Buche; Birke; MDF/HDF (Holzwerkstoff); Mahagoni; Ahorn; Eiche; Okoumé; Sperrholz (nicht spezifiziert); Pappel; Fichte; Walnuss; Sonstige
nb: Overflatemateriale for spill: Baltisk bjørk; Bøk; Bjørk; MDF/HDF (konstruert tre); Mahogni; Lønn; Eik; Okoumé; Kryssfiner (uspesifisert); Poppel; Gran; Valnøtt; Annet
it: Materiale della superficie di gioco: Betulla del Baltico; Faggio; Betulla; MDF/HDF (legno ingegnerizzato); Mogano; Acero; Rovere; Okoumé; Compensato (non specificato); Pioppo; Abete; Noce; Altro
sk-SK: Materiál hracej plochy: Pobaltská breza; Buk; Breza; MDF/HDF (technické drevo); Mahagón; Javor; Dub; Okoumé; Preglejka (nešpecifikovaná); Topoľ; Smrek; Orech; Iné
el: Υλικό επιφάνειας παιχνιδιού: Σημύδα Βαλτικής; Οξιά; Σημύδα; MDF/HDF (τεχνητό ξύλο); Μαόνι; Σφένδαμος; Δρυς; Οκουμέ; Κόντρα πλακέ (μη καθορισμένο); Λεύκα; Έλατο; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
vi: Chất liệu bề mặt chơi: Gỗ phong vàng Baltic; Gỗ dẻ gai; Gỗ phong vàng; MDF/HDF (gỗ công nghiệp); Gỗ gụ; Gỗ phong; Gỗ sồi; Gỗ Okoume; Gỗ dán (không xác định); Gỗ dương; Gỗ vân sam; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
sv: Material för spelyta: Baltisk björk; Bok; Björk; MDF/HDF (konstruerat trä); Mahogny; Lönn; Ek; Okoume; Plywood (ospecificerat); Poppel; Gran; Valnöt; Övrigt
ro-RO: Materialul suprafeței de joc: Mesteacăn baltic; Fag; Mesteacăn; MDF/HDF (lemn prelucrat); Mahon; Arțar; Stejar; Okoume; Placaj (nespecificat); Plop; Molid; Nuc; Altele
sl-SI: Material igralne površine: Baltska breza; Bukev; Breza; MDF/HDF (konstrukcijski les); Mahagonij; Javor; Hrast; Okume; Vezana plošča (neopredeljeno); Topol; Smreka; Oreh; Drugo
ru: Материал игровой поверхности: Балтийская береза; Бук; Береза; МДФ/ХДФ; Махагони (красное дерево); Клен; Дуб; Окуме; Фанера (не указана); Тополь; Ель; Орех; Другое
es: Material de la superficie de juego: Abedul báltico; Haya; Abedul; MDF/HDF (madera de ingeniería); Caoba; Arce; Roble; Ocume; Madera contrachapada (no especificada); Álamo; Abeto; Nogal; Otro
pl: Materiał powierzchni do zabawy: Brzoza bałtycka; Buk; Brzoza; MDF/HDF (drewno konstrukcyjne); Mahoń; Klon; Dąb; Okoume; Sklejka (nieokreślona); Topola; Świerk; Orzech; Inny
hu: Játszófelület anyaga: Balti nyír; Bükk; Nyír; MDF/HDF (műfa); Mahagóni; Juhar; Tölgy; Okoumé; Rétegelt lemez (nem meghatározott); Nyárfa; Lucfenyő; Dió; Egyéb
zh-CN: 击打面材质: 波罗的海桦木; 榉木; 桦木; 中密度纤维板/高密度纤维板（工程木）; 桃花心木; 枫木; 橡木; 奥古曼木; 胶合板（未指定）; 杨木; 云杉木; 胡桃木; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на игралната повърхност: Балтийска бреза; Бук; Бреза; MDF/HDF (инженерна дървесина); Махагон; Клен; Дъб; Окуме; Шперплат (неуточнен); Топола; Смърч; Орех; Други
pt-BR: Percussão, material da superfície: Bétula do Báltico; Faia; Bétula; MDF/HDF (madeira de engenharia); Mogno; Bordo; Carvalho; Okoumé; Compensado (não especificado); Álamo; Abeto; Nogueira; Outro
ko: 연주면 소재: 발틱 자작나무; 너도밤나무; 자작나무; MDF/HDF(공학 목재); 마호가니; 단풍나무; 참나무; 오쿠메; 합판(미지정); 포플러; 가문비나무; 호두나무; 기타